Utah statutes.
31A-33-111.   Adoption of rates.

(1)  The Workers' Compensation Fund shall adopt the rates approved by the insurance commissioner under Chapter 19a, Part 4, Workers' Compensation Rates.

(2)  The chief executive officer, with the approval of the board, may file with the insurance commissioner a resolution to deviate from the rates approved by the insurance commissioner in order to provide workers' compensation insurance at the lowest possible cost to policyholders consistent with maintaining the actuarial soundness of the Injury Fund.



Amended by Chapter 130, 1999 General Session

